Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 9. Watchmen.

Sec. 34.35.395.
Watchman’s lien.

A person employed as watchman for real or personal property has a lien upon the property for the wages or salary earned as a watchman for the property.

History.

(§ 26-7-1 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.400.
Services or work covered by lien.

The person performing the services or doing the work named in AS

34.35.395

is only entitled to a lien under AS

34.35.395

—

34.35.425

for services or work for the nine months or a shorter period preceding the recording of the claim of lien under AS

34.35.405

.

History.

(§ 26-7-2 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.405.
Lien claim.

A person who claims a lien under AS

34.35.395

—

34.35.425

shall, within 90 days after the completion of the services or the cessation of the labor, record a claim of lien in the recorder’s office of the recording district in which the property is located.

The lien claim must contain a true statement of

the demand and the amount of the demand after deducting all just credits and offsets;

the name of the person by whom the claimant is employed and a statement of the terms and conditions of the contract of employment;

a description of the property sufficient for identification on which the lien is claimed; and

the name of the owner or reputed owner of the property.

The lien claim shall be verified by the oath of the claimant or someone on behalf of the lien claimant who has personal knowledge of the facts.

If there is no express contract of employment the claim must state the reasonable value of the work or services.

History.

(§ 26-7-3 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsection (a) of this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.410.
Recording and indexing claim.

The recorder shall record the lien claim in a record book or computer-readable medium kept for that purpose. The record book shall be indexed.

The recorder is entitled to receive the same fees allowed by law for recording deeds and other instruments.

History.

(§ 26-7-4 ACLA 1949; am § 40 ch 30 SLA 1996)

Sec. 34.35.415.
Duration of lien.

A lien under AS

34.35.395

—

34.35.425

does not bind property for more than six months after the lien is recorded, unless suit is brought before the proper court to enforce the lien within that time or if credit is given, within nine months after the expiration of the credit.

A lien does not continue in force for more than one year from the stopping of the work or services by an agreement to give credit.

History.

(§ 26-7-5 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsection (a) of this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.420.
Extent of lien.

The lien provided in AS

34.35.395

—

34.35.425

binds all the right, title, and interest of the person at whose instance or request or for whom the work or services are performed, to the full extent of the interest that the person has at the commencement of the work or services for which the lien is claimed or that is subsequently acquired up to the time of the foreclosure of the lien, in the property where the work or services are performed.

History.

(§ 26-7-6 ACLA 1949)

Collateral references. —

Priority as between mechanic's lien and purchase-money mortgage.
73 ALR2d 1407

Priority between mechanics' liens and advances made under previously executed mortgage. 80 ALR2d 179.

Sec. 34.35.425.
Priority.

A lien under AS

34.35.395

—

34.35.425

is preferred, prior, and superior to a mortgage, attachment, claim, or demand made or recorded in the recorder’s office of the recording district in which the property is located, after the commencement of the work or services for which the lien is claimed.

A sale, transfer, mortgage, assignment, or attachment recorded after the commencement of the work or services does not postpone the lien, except that the lien is of equal rank with other liens recorded or claimed against the property for work or services performed or furnished in the erection, construction, repair, or preservation of the property.

History.

(§ 26-7-6 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.